cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX G Y 263
SFX G 0 етӗп/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗветӗп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тӗп/RT е
SFX G 0 местӗп/RT .
SFX G 0 етӗн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗветӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тӗн/RT е
SFX G 0 местӗн/RT .
SFX G 0 ет/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвет/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 т/RT е
SFX G 0 мест/RT .
SFX G 0 етпӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗветпӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тпӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 местпӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 етӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗветӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 местӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 еҫҫӗ [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеҫҫӗ ӳ
SFX G 0 ҫҫӗ е
SFX G 0 меҫҫӗ .
SFX G 0 еетӗп/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеетӗп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етӗп/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместӗп/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвейместӗп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместӗп/RT е
SFX G 0 еетӗн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеетӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етӗн/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместӗн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвейместӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместӗн/RT е
SFX G 0 еет/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеет/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ет/RT е
SFX G 0 еймест/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеймест/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ймест/RT е
SFX G 0 еетпӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеетпӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етпӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместпӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвейместпӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместпӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 еетӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеетӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвейместӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 ееҫҫӗ/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвееҫҫӗ/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 еҫҫӗ/RT е
SFX G 0 еймеҫҫӗ/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвеймеҫҫӗ/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ймеҫҫӗ/RT е
SFX G 0 ӗп/RT [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йӗп/RT и
SFX G е ӗп/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мӗп/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗн/RT [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йӗн/RT и
SFX G е ӗн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мӗн/RT .
SFX G 0 еймӗн/RT [^еиӳ]
SFX G 0 ймӗн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвеймӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ӗ/R [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йӗ/R и
SFX G е ӗ/R е
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗ/R ӳ
SFX G 0 мӗ/R . 
SFX G 0 ӗпӗр/RT [^еӳи]
SFX G 0 йӗпӗр/RT и
SFX G е ӗпӗр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗпӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мӗпӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗр/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G ӗ ӗр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗҫ/T [^еиӳ]
SFX G е ӗҫ/T е
SFX G 0 йӗҫ/T и
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗҫ/T ӳ
SFX G 0 мӗҫ/TR .
SFX G 0 рӗм/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тӗм/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерӗм/RT .
SFX G 0 рӗн/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тӗн/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерӗн/RT .
SFX G 0 рӗ/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 чӗ/T [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерӗ/RT .
SFX G 0 рӗмӗр/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тӗмӗр/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерӗмӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 рӗр/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тӗр/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 рӗҫ/T [^лрн]
SFX G 0 чӗҫ/T [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерӗҫ/T .
SFX G 0 еттӗм/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттӗм/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗветтӗм/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местӗм/RT .
SFX G 0 еттӗн/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттӗн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗветтӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местӗн/RT .
SFX G 0 етчӗ/T [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 тчӗ/T е
SFX G ӳ ӗветчӗ/T ӳ
SFX G 0 местчӗ/T .
SFX G 0 еттӗмӗр/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттӗмӗр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗветтӗмӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местӗмӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 еттӗр/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттӗр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗветтӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 етчӗҫ/T [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 тчӗҫ/T е
SFX G ӳ ӗветчӗҫ/T ӳ
SFX G 0 местчӗҫ/T .
SFX G 0 сеттӗм/RT .
SFX G 0 сеттӗн/RT .
SFX G 0 сеччӗ/T .
SFX G 0 сеттӗмӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 сеттӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 сеччӗҫ/T .
SFX G 0 ӗттӗм/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗттӗм/RT ӳ
SFX G е ӗттӗм/RT е
SFX G 0 меттӗм/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗттӗн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗттӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G е ӗттӗн/RT е
SFX G 0 мӗттӗн/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗччӗ/T [^ӳе]
SFX G ӗ ӗвӗччӗ/T ӳ
SFX G е ӗччӗ/T е
SFX G 0 мӗччӗ/T .
SFX G 0 ӗттӗмӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗттӗмӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G е ӗттӗмӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 мӗттӗмӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗттӗр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗттӗр/RT ӳ
SFX G е ӗттӗр/RT е
SFX G 0 мӗттӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗччӗҫ/T [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗччӗҫ/T ӳ
SFX G е ӗччӗҫ/T е
SFX G 0 мӗччӗҫ/T .
SFX G 0 ӗпин [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗпин ӳ
SFX G 0 йӗпин и
SFX G е ӗпин е
SFX G 0 мӗпин .
SFX G 0 ӗсӗн [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗсӗн ӳ
SFX G 0 йӗсӗн и
SFX G е ӗсӗн е
SFX G 0 мӗсӗн .
SFX G 0 ин/R [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ӗвин/R ӳ
SFX G 0 йин/R и
SFX G е ин е
SFX G 0 мин/RT .
SFX G 0 ӗпӗрин/T [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ӑвӑпӑрин/T ӳ
SFX G е ӗпӗрин е
SFX G 0 йӗпӗрин и
SFX G 0 мӗпӗрин .
SFX G 0 ӗсӗр/T [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗсӗр/T ӳ
SFX G 0 йӗсӗр/T и
SFX G е ӗсӗр/T е
SFX G 0 мӗсӗр/T .
SFX G 0 ӗҫин [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йӗҫин и
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗҫин ӳ
SFX G е ӗҫин е
SFX G 0 мӗҫин .
SFX G 0 ем/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвем/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 м/RT е
SFX G 0 тӗр/RT .
SFX G 0 ер/R [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвер/R ӳ
SFX G 0 р/R е
SFX G 0 ӗр/T [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ӗвӗр/T ӳ
SFX G е ӗр/T е
SFX G 0 ччӗр/T .
SFX G 0 ме/T .
SFX G 0 месӗр/T .
SFX G 0 мешкӗн/T .
SFX G 0 екен/B [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 екенсем/P [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 кен/B е
SFX G 0 кенсем/P е
SFX G ӳ ӗвекен/B ӳ
SFX G ӳ ӗвекенсем/P ӳ
SFX G 0 ни/BT .
SFX G 0 нисем/P .
SFX G 0 менни/BT .
SFX G 0 меннисем/P .
SFX G 0 мелли/BRT .
SFX G 0 меллисем/P .
SFX G 0 есси/BRT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ессисем/P [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 сси/BRT е
SFX G 0 ссисем/P е
SFX G ӳ ӗвесси/BRT ӳ
SFX G ӳ ӗвессисем/P ӳ
SFX G 0 ес/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 с/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвес/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 есле/T [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 сле/T е
SFX G ӳ ӗвесле/T ӳ
SFX G 0 есшӗн/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 сшӗн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвесшӗн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 нӗ/RT .
SFX G 0 нӗшӗн/T .
SFX G 0 нӗрен/T .
SFX G 0 мелле/RT .
SFX G 0 ен/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 н/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӗвен/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 се/RT .
SFX G 0 сен/T .
SFX G 0 сессӗн/T .
SFX G 0 месен/T .
SFX G 0 месессӗн/T .
SFX G 0 е [^еӳ]
SFX G ӳ ӗве ӳ
SFX G 0 иччен/T [^еӳ]
SFX G е иччен/T е
SFX G ӳ ӗвиччен/T ӳ
SFX G 0 миччен/T .
SFX G 0 мессерен/T .
SFX G 0 нӗҫемӗн/T .
SFX G 0 мен/RT .
SFX G 0 меншӗн/T .
SFX G 0 еймен/RT [еӳ]
SFX G 0 ймен/RT е
SFX G ӳ ӑвеймен/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ейменшӗн/T [еӳ]
SFX G 0 йменшӗн/T е
SFX G ӳ ӑвейменшӗн/T ӳ
