cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӗмрӗл/G
ҫиллен/G
ҫит/G
ҫӳре/G
ӗҫсӗрлен/G
ӗлкӗрт/G
ӗлккенлет/G
ӗмӗрттер/G
ӗмӗтсӗрлен/G
ӗнӗр/G
ӗнӗх/G
ӗнселе/G
ӗнтӗрӗклен/G
ӗнтӗхтер/G
ӗрӗплеттер/G
ӗревӗҫлен/G
ӗретсӗрлен/G
ӗрлентер/G
ӗрче/G
ӗселе/G
ӗслет/G
ӗхӗлтет/G
ӗшӗр/G
ӗшентер/G
ӗшкентер/G
Жуковский/G
Ленин/G
Менделеев/G
Сталин/G
абстракциле/G
авторизациле/G
адаптациле/G
аккумуляциле/G
амортизацилен/G
аннексиле/G
апчӑххилет/G
ассимиляциле/G
астив/G
бактерилен/G
вӑшиклеттер/G
вӗҫерт/G
вӗҫкӗнлен/G
вӗҫлекелен/G
вӗҫлеттер/G
вӗлкӗш/G
вӗлтлет/G
вӗрӗлтер/G
вӗрен/GB
вӗрент/G
вӗриле/G
вӗрилеттер/G
вӗркӗш/G
вӗркеш/G
вӗселен/G
вӗсхе/G
вӗтӗлентер/G
вӗтӗнтер/G
вӗтӗртет/G
вӗтелен/G
вӗткелентер/G
вӗчӗклен/G
вӗчӗлтеттер/G
вӗчӗхлентер/G
вӗшӗлтет/G
валемле/G
венчетлен/G
виҫҫӗлен/G
виҫелентер/G
вилӗмсӗрлет/G
виркӗслен/G
вирхӗн/G
виселентер/G
витӗмлен/G
витӗнтер/G
витлеттер/G
витрелет/G
вичкӗнлет/G
гальванизациле/G
гармониле/G
деградацилен/G
дезинфекцилентер/G
декорациле/G
демократиле/G
деморализацилентер/G
дисквалификацилентер/G
дислокацилен/G
дифференциациле/G
евӗрлен/G
ейкелен/G
ейӳлентер/G
елпӗр/G
емпӗлтет/G
епрелен/G
ерҫ/G
ермеш/G
ешӗллен/G
ешерт/G
извеҫлен/G
ийӗх/G
иккӗле/G
иклет/G
иксӗт/G
илӗрт/G
илемле/G
илемлет/G
илемсӗрлет/G
илеш/G
иллюстрацилеттер/G
илтер/G
имӗрӗл/G
именчӗклентер/G
имкет/G
иммунизациле/G
имрет/G
имшерлет/G
индустрелентер/G
индустрилен/G
инкрустациле/G
интеграциле/G
интереслентер/G
ионизациле/G
иплен/G
ирӗклентер/G
ирӗксӗрлентер/G
ирӗн/G
ирт/G
иртӗхтер/G
искер/G
ислеттер/G
ихӗлтеттер/G
иш/G
йӑпӑлтилен/G
йӗкӗлентер/G
йӗкӗрешлен/G
йӗкӗтлен/G
йӗклентер/G
йӗксӳлентер/G
йӗлпӗрӗн/G
йӗнерле/G
йӗпӗлтет/G
йӗпеттер/G
йӗпселе/G
йӗрӗн/G
йӗркелен/G
йӗркесӗрлен/G
йӗрлеш/G
йӗсле/G
йанла/G
йӳҫӗх/G
йӳҫтер/G
йӳнеҫӗн/G
йӳнсӗрлен/G
йӳрӗклентер/G
йӳтен/G
йӳшкӗн/G
кӑриклет/G
кӗҫҫелентер/G
кӗҫӗт/G
кӗҫентер/G
кӗвӗлен/G
кӗвелен/G
кӗвиклет/G
кӗлемеле/G
кӗлерӗн/G
кӗлеттер/G
кӗллентер/G
кӗлтӗртеттер/G
кӗмӗллентер/G
кӗмпӗртет/G
кӗнтеле/G
кӗпӗртет/G
кӗрӗлтет/G
кӗрӗш/G
кӗренлентер/G
кӗреш/G
кӗрлеттер/G
кӗрмеле/G
кӗрнеклен/G
кӗрпеклен/G
кӗрслеттер/G
кӗртлеш/G
кӗселлентер/G
кӗскет/G
кӗсменле/G
кӗтесле/G
кӗххӗмлет/G
кӗштӗр/G
кавле/G
камитлентер/G
канонизациле/G
кансӗрлеттер/G
картельле/G
катерт/G
квалификацилен/G
кептерт/G
кивҫенлентер/G
кивелтер/G
кивтер/G
килӗш/G
килӗшӳсӗрлентер/G
кимӗл/G
кимӗттер/G
кипеклеттер/G
киревсӗрлен/G
киреметлен/G
кис/G
кисреттер/G
кишӗкле/G
кодификациле/G
колонилле/G
конденсациле/G
конкретизацилен/G
конструкциле/G
конфискациле/G
кооперацилен/G
краҫҫынлан/G
куҫҫульлен/G
кукалентер/G
культивациле/G
кутеклентер/G
кӳл/G
кӳлеш/G
кӳлтерттер/G
кӳп/G
кӳпкеттер/G
кӳптӗрккелен/G
кӳпче/G
кӳпшеклентер/G
кӳрнеҫтер/G
кӳттер/G
лӗкӗлентер/G
лӗклентер/G
лӗнкӗртет/G
лӗпӗлен/G
лӗпӗртет/G
лӗплен/G
лӗрплеттер/G
лакейлен/G
легализациле/G
лектер/G
ленчӗртеттер/G
ленчешкеле/G
лепӗрккеле/G
лепӗстет/G
лечӗрт/G
лечекелентер/G
локализацилен/G
лӳпперлен/G
лӳшке/G
мӑкӑлле/G
мӗкӗлтет/G
мӗкӗрт/G
мӗрчен/G
мӗхле/G
мӗштӗртет/G
машинизациле/G
мекеклет/G
мерчче/G
мехелен/G
милитаризациле/G
минкет/G
мишерле/CG
модернизацилен/G
мультипликациле/G
муритле/G
нӑриклет/G
нӗрсӗрлентер/G
национализациле/G
никӗсле/G
нимӗрӗл/G
нишлен/G
нӳрет/G
нӳслентер/G
ответле/G
пӗҫерт/G
пӗвет/G
пӗкӗн/G
пӗкле/G
пӗлтер/G
пӗрӗнтер/G
пӗрешкеле/G
пӗркеле/G
пӗркентер/G
пӗрпеклен/G
пӗртекле/G
пӗрчӗлен/G
пӗрьевӗрлет/G
пӗтӗҫлентер/G
пӗтӗлентер/G
пӗтӗрӗн/G
пӗтӗш/G
пӗчӗклен/G
пӗшкӗн/G
пастеризациле/G
перӗнтер/G
перкелеш/G
пехиллеш/G
пиҫ/G
пиеле/G
пикентер/G
пиллеш/G
пирчентер/G
писевле/G
питӗлен/G
питӗрлен/G
пичевле/G
политехнизациле/G
преступленилле/CG
протестле/G
путекле/G
пӳклеттер/G
пӳлӗнтер/G
радиофикациле/G
ревизиле/G
регистрацилен/G
редукцилен/G
реконструкциле/G
реорганизациле/G
репрессиле/G
ретлен/G
ретсӗрлен/G
рехетлентер/G
сӗвӗрӗл/G
сӗвеле/G
сӗвентер/G
сӗкӗн/G
сӗлкӗш/G
сӗлпӗрлен/G
сӗлтӗрке/G
сӗмлентер/G
сӗмсӗрлет/G
сӗнкӗлтеттер/G
сӗрӗлтет/G
сӗрӗх/G
сӗркелен/G
сӗрт/G
сӗтӑрӗнтер/G
сӗте/G
сӗткенлентер/G
сегрегациле/G
семетле/G
сенхерле/G
сехӗрлен/G
сивӗнтер/G
сивлеттер/G
сиенлет/G
сийлен/G
сиккелен/G
силле/G
симӗсле/G
символизациле/G
синкерлен/G
сиплен/G
сиплеш/G
сирӗлтер/G
сирпӗттер/G
сисӗн/G
ситрет/G
специализациле/CG
стабилизациле/G
стенографиле/G
стилизациле/G
суйӑр/G
супинккен/G
сӳле/G
сӳлтӗрке/G
сӳпӗлтет/G
сӳрӗл/G
сӳреле/G
сӳсен/G
сӳслентер/G
сӳтӗкле/G
сӳттер/G
тӗвӗлентер/G
тӗкӗле/G
тӗкӗш/G
тӗклентер/G
тӗктер/G
тӗлӗнтер/G
тӗлкӗштер/G
тӗллентер/G
тӗмелен/G
тӗмпӗртет/G
тӗмсӗлтер/G
тӗнкӗлтет/G
тӗпӗлтет/G
тӗпӗртеттер/G
тӗпле/G
тӗпрет/G
тӗрӗлен/G
тӗрӗнтер/G
тӗрӗслеттер/G
тӗревлеттер/G
тӗреклет/G
тӗрексӗрлет/G
тӗркӗлтет/G
тӗркӗштер/G
тӗркен/G
тӗрлеш/G
тӗррӗслет/G
тӗртӗш/G
тӗртлет/G
тӗсет/G
тӗссӗрлет/G
тӗтӗр/G
тӗтреле/G
тӗттӗмле/CG
тӗшӗле/G
тӗшӗрӗл/G
тӗшлеттер/G
таксациле/G
телейсӗрлен/G
теплофикациле/G
тивӗҫ/GB
тивтер/G
тиеттер/G
тикӗслеттер/G
тиклет/G
тилмӗрт/G
тимӗрлен/G
тимлен/G
тинкӗле/G
тинкелентер/G
типӗнтер/G
типтер/FG
типшӗмлет/G
типшер/G
тиркеттер/G
тирпейлен/G
тискерлентер/G
тишкер/G
транскрипциле/G
тӳ/G
тӳлеклен/G
тӳлеттер/G
тӳмелентер/G
тӳнкӗртеттер/G
тӳнлет/G
тӳпӗлтет/G
тӳпелеш/G
тӳплет/G
тӳремлен/G
тӳрлен/G
тӳртӗн/G
тӳстер/G
тӳчке/G
упӑтелен/G
фальсификациле/CG
хӗвӗш/G
хӗлхемле/G
хӗмсӗрлен/G
хӗнеш/G
хӗпӗртевлӗн/G
хӗрӗнкӗлентер/G
хӗремеслентер/G
хӗреслет/G
хӗртӗнтер/G
хӗрхен/G
хӗрӳлен/G
хӗсӗр/G
хӗстер/G
хӗтӗхле/G
хатӗрлентер/G
хелхемлен/G
хиврен/G
хирӗҫтер/G
хирӗнтер/G
хисеплеттер/G
хитрелен/G
хулленлен/G
хӳлтӗр/G
хӳнкӗртеттер/G
хӳтӗле/G
хӳхӗмлен/G
цивилизациле/G
чӗвӗн/G
чӗвлет/G
чӗкел/G
чӗлпӗклен/G
чӗлхелен/G
чӗмпӗлтеттер/G
чӗн/G
чӗнтӗрлен/G
чӗпӗлтет/G
чӗрӗлет/G
чӗреслет/G
чӗркелен/G
чӗркеттер/G
чӗрмелен/G
чӗрпӗн/G
чӗтрен/G
чеелен/G
черетлентер/G
чечеклентер/G
чикӗле/G
чикӗнтер/G
чиклет/G
чилет/G
чиперлентер/G
чӳлӗкле/G
чӳхеттер/G
шӗвеклен/G
шӗвет/G
шӗкӗлчен/G
шӗмпӗлтеттер/G
шӗркет/G
шарилеттер/G
шелтӗртет/G
шеплеттер/G
шерпетлен/G
шиклеттер/G
шиплет/G
шукӑллентер/G
шӳтле/G
эйлет/G
эксплуатациле/G
электрификациле/G
эмелле/G
энченлен/G
эренлен/G
эрешлентер/G
эсрелле/CG
этемлет/G
юплен/G
яровизацилен/G
ӳкӗтле/G
ӳкерттер/G
ӳпӗнтер/G
ӳпкелеш/G
ӳрӗклен/G
ӳркентер/G
ӳсӗр/FGB
ӳсӗрттер/G
ӳхӗр/G
